Louisiana, session 2026, HB954.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1289.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1289.2. Automobile insurance policies; mandatory right to appraisal
A. All automotive insurance policies, in Louisiana, shall include a Right to
Appraisal (RTA) clause, which allows policyholders to resolve disputes over claim
valuations through an independent appraisal process.
(1) The RTA process shall include two independent appraisers, which
includes the following:
(a) One of the appraisers chosen by the insurer.
(b) One of the appraisers chosen by the policyholder.
(c) A neutral umpire to resolve disputes.
(2) The RTA process shall follow the processes outlined in R.S. 22:1807.13
and R.S. 22:1807.19.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1190 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 954